Montana, session 2025, SB289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. County notification of proposed valuation decrease -- meeting. (1) Except as provided
in subsection (5) (6), if the preliminary change in market value of any property in a county has decreased by
more than $1.5 million since the last reappraisal, the department shall send an electronic notice to the county
where the property is located. The notice may be sent in an electronic format that includes more than one
property on the notice. The department shall send a copy of the county notice to each municipality located
within the boundaries of the county that has received the notice.
(2) The county notice must:
(a) be sent no later than when the original or revised classification and appraisal notice is sent to
the property owner pursuant to 15-7-102; and
(b) provide the market value for the prior reappraisal cycle and the preliminary market value.
(3) The department shall meet with the county when requested.
(4) The department shall provide the county with any public information that was relied on by the
department to establish a preliminary market value before the meeting provided for in subsection (2) (3).
(5) For properties that are subject to central assessment, the department shall send the notice
described in subsection (1) after completing the apportionment process.
(5)(6) This section does not apply to class four residential property.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
15, chapter 7, part 1, and the provisions of Title 15, chapter 7, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 289
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 289
Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to property tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 289
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 289, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 289
INTRODUCED BY D. LOGE
AN ACT PROVIDING FOR COUNTY NOTIFICATION BY THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FOR CERTAIN
PROPOSED PROPERTY TAX ADJUSTMENTS; AND PROVIDING AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”